Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, for a health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, that provides coverage for labor and delivery services, labor and delivery services are not subject to the enrollee's deductible. Any cost sharing for labor and delivery services paid by an enrollee must be applied toward the enrollee's deductible obligation.(2) For a health plan that provides coverage of labor and delivery services and is offered as a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, the health carrier shall establish the plan's deductible for the coverage of the labor and delivery services at the minimum level necessary to preserve the enrollee's ability to claim tax exempt contributions from their health savings account under internal revenue service laws and regulations.Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.017 and 2024 c 251 s 5 and 2024 c 242 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, section 1 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The office of the insurance commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this act.--- END ---